Hawaii statutes.
[§269-146] Hawaii electricity reliability
surcharge; authorization; cost recovery. (a) The commission may require,
by rule or order, that all utilities, persons, businesses, or entities
connecting to the Hawaii electric system, or any other user, owner, or operator
of any electric element that is a part of an interconnection on the Hawaii
electric system shall pay a surcharge that shall be collected by Hawaii's
electric utilities. The commission shall not contract or otherwise delegate
the ability to create the Hawaii electricity reliability surcharge under this
section to any other entity. This surcharge amount shall be known as the
Hawaii electricity reliability surcharge.

(b) Amounts collected through the Hawaii
electricity reliability surcharge shall be transferred in whole or in part to
any entity contracted by the commission to act as the Hawaii electricity
reliability administrator provided for under this part.

(c) The Hawaii electricity reliability
surcharge shall be used for the purposes of ensuring the reliable operation of
the Hawaii electric system and overseeing grid access on the Hawaii electric
system through the activities of the Hawaii electricity reliability
administrator contracted under section 269-147; provided that amounts collected
under the Hawaii electricity reliability surcharge shall not be available to
meet any current or past general obligations of the State.

(d) The commission may allow an electric
utility to recover appropriate and reasonable costs under the Hawaii electricity
reliability surcharge for any interconnection to the Hawaii electric system,
including interconnection studies and other analysis associated with studying
the impact or necessary infrastructure and operational requirements needed to
reliably interconnect a generator, as well as from electric utility customers
through a surcharge or assessment subject to review and approval by the
commission under section 269-16.

(e) Nothing in this section shall create or be
construed to cause amounts collected through the Hawaii electricity reliability
surcharge to be considered state or public moneys subject to appropriation by
the legislature or be required to be deposited into the state treasury. [L
2012, c 166, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next